src/sma-lex.txt
LEXICON BÅETEDH_NOTVGEN ! row A - Group I
 +Ind+Prs+Uml:%>%^1UMLa   V-I-PRS-SG ; ! class I special
 +Ind+Prs:%>ie        VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
 +Ind+Prt+Dial/L:%>iej        VSUF-ODD-PRT ;
 +Ind+Prt+Uml+Dial/SH:%>%^iUML    VSUF-PRT ;
! +Imprt:%>              VSUF-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
 +Inf:%>edh           FINAL1 ;
 +ConNeg:%>ieh        FINAL1 ;
! +Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
 +Ger:%>ieminie       FINAL1 ;
 +Ger+Use/Sub:%>eminie FINAL1 ;
 +PrsPrc:%>ije        FINAL1 ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes        FINAL1 ;
 +PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme  FINAL1 ;
 ! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
 +Der3+Der/NomAg:%»iej@C.NeedNoun@     IJE_ODD ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAg+Use/Sub:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     IJE_ODD ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAct:%»iem@C.NeedNoun@    NomActOdd ;
 +Der1+Der/les:%»%^1UMLa%^COMPDISIMPl LES ;
 +Der3+Der/gåete+V:%»iegået GÅETEDH ;
! +Der1+Der/stidh+V:%»iest DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/lidh+V:%»iel GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/htjidh+V:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/htidh:%»ieht DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV ;
!! +Der1+Der/dehte:%»iedeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
 +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»iejahtj AHTJE ;
! +Der1+Der/ldihkie:%»%^1UMLaldihkie ø_Ø_EVEN ;
! +Der1+Der/ldahke:%»%^1UMLaldahk LDAHKE ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+SgNomCmp:%»%^1UMLeldh R ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLeldh FINAL1 ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%»%^1UMLeld FINAL1 ; !


LEXICON SEVTEDH ! row A - Group I  IMPERSONALS!
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%>%^1UMLa   FINAL1 ; ! class I special
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%>ieji        FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%>iej%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%>%^iUMLi    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Use/Sub:%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi  FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>              VSUF-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
 +V+IV+Inf:%>edh           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+ConNeg:%>ieh        FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+VGen:%>ien          FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ger:%>ieminie       FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme  FINAL1 ;
 ! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg:%»iej@C.NeedNoun@     IJE_ODD ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct:%»iem@C.NeedNoun@    NomActOdd ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/les:%»%^1UMLa%^COMPDISIMPl LES ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
 +V+IV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%»iegået%>%^1UMLa FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%»iegået%>%^iUMLi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»iegået%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Inf:%»iegået%>edh           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+ConNeg:%»iegået%>ieh        FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+VGen:%»iegået%>ien          FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Act:%»iegået%>eme           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+Ger:%»iegået%>ieminie       FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V+PrfPrc+Uml:%»iegået%>%^1UMLeme  FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»iest%>%^DISIMPe FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iest%>i FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»iest%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Inf:%»iest%>idh             FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+ConNeg:%»iest%>%^DISIMPh    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+VGen:%»iest%>%^DISIMPen     FINAL1 ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Act:%»iest%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Ger:%»iest%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1 ; ! = GH Gerundium
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+PrfPrc:%»iest%>amme         FINAL1 ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
                                   !   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>%^3sUMLa FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>i FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Inf:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>edh      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+VGen:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>en      FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Act:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+Ger:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+PrfPrc:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>eme   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V+Der2+Der/alle+V+ConNeg:%»iest%»%^adteUMLall%>0h    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»iel%>%^DISIMPe FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iel%>i FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»iel%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Inf:%»iel%>idh             FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+ConNeg:%»iel%>%^DISIMPh    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+VGen:%»iel%>%^DISIMPen     FINAL1 ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Act:%»iel%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Ger:%»iel%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1 ; ! = GH Gerundium
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+PrfPrc:%»iel%>amme         FINAL1 ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
                                   !   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>i FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>en      FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»iel%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPe FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>i FINAL1 ;
  +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Inf:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>idh             FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+ConNeg:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPh    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+VGen:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPen     FINAL1 ; ! = GH Modalis, KB måtesform, GH Voluntativ
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Act:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Ger:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPeminie  FINAL1 ; ! = GH Gerundium
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+PrfPrc:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>amme         FINAL1 ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
                                   !   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>i FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>en      FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»iejahtj%>edh      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»iejahtj%>en      FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»iejahtj%>eme      FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»iejahtj%>eminie   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»iejahtj%>eme   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»iejahtj%>0h    FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»iejahtj%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iejahtj%>i     FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/Sub:%»iejahtj%>%^DISIMPi     FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^1UMLahtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lgidh:%»%^1UMLalg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldihkie:%»%^1UMLaldihkie ø_Ø_EVEN ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldahke:%»%^1UMLaldahk LDAHKE ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+SgNomCmp:%»%^1UMLeldh R ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLeldh FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%»%^1UMLeld FINAL1 ; !


 
LEXICON ÅEREDH ! row A - Group I   NO -øø-UMLAUT!!!!
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Uml:%>%^1UMLa   V-I-PRS-SG ; ! class I special
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>ie        VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>iej        VSUF-ODD-PRT ;
! +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml:%>%^iUML    VSUF-PRT ; NO -øø-UMLAUT!!!!
 +V+IV+Imprt:%>              VSUF-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
 +V+IV+Inf:%>edh           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+ConNeg:%>ieh        FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+VGen:%>ien          FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ger:%>ieminie       FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ije        FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ijes        FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme  FINAL1 ;
 ! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg:%»iej@C.NeedNoun@     IJE_ODD ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+Use/Sub:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     IJE_ODD ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct:%»iem@C.NeedNoun@    NomActOdd ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/les:%»%^1UMLa%^COMPDISIMPl LES ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
 +V+IV+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/gåete+V:%»iegået GÅETEDH ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/stidh+V:%»iest DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/lidh+V:%»iel GOLTELIDH ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htjidh+V:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj GOLTELIDH ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htidh:%»ieht DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/dehte:%»iedeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»iejahtj AHTJE ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^1UMLahtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lgidh:%»%^1UMLalg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldihkie:%»%^1UMLaldihkie ø_Ø_EVEN ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldahke:%»%^1UMLaldahk LDAHKE ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+SgNomCmp:%»%^1UMLeldh R ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLeldh FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%»%^1UMLeld FINAL1 ; !
 
  
